Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1063.
do enact as follows:AB1063,11Section 1. 6.10 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1063,2,526.10 (1) The residence of a person is the place where the person’s principal or 3primary home or place of abode is located, where the person’s habitation is fixed, 4without any present intent to move, and to which, when absent, the person intends 5has the present intent to return.AB1063,26Section 2. 8.28 (3) of the statutes is created to read:AB1063,2,1478.28 (3) (a) 1. At the beginning of each biennial session, and annually while 8holding office, each person elected to the legislature shall file with the legislative 9reference bureau and the chief clerk of the house to which the person is elected a 10statement, sworn under oath, certifying that the person is a resident of the district 11he or she was elected to represent and copies of 2 different identifying documents 12specified in s. 6.34 (3) (a) establishing proof of residence in that district. The 13commission shall prescribe the form of the statement, which shall inform the 14person filing the statement of the penalty for false swearing under s. 946.32.AB1063,2,19152. No later than 10 days after a person elected to the legislature changes his or 16her residence, he or she shall notify the legislative reference bureau and the chief 17clerk of the house to which the person is elected of the change in residence and shall 18file a sworn statement and copies of identifying documents establishing proof of 19residence under subd. 1. for the new residence.AB1063,3,413. Any person elected to the legislature who fails to satisfy subd. 1. or 2. shall 2be subject to the investigation and quo warranto process provided under sub. (2). 3The legislative reference bureau or chief clerk shall notify the attorney general of 4any such violation.AB1063,3,95(b) 1. If the legislative reference bureau or the chief clerk of the house to which 6a person is elected has credible evidence that a person elected to the legislature 7does not reside in the district he or she was elected to represent, the legislative 8reference bureau or chief clerk shall immediately transmit that credible evidence to 9the attorney general and the commission.AB1063,3,16102. If, upon receiving the evidence under subd. 1., the attorney general finds 11probable cause to believe that the subject person is not qualified to hold his or her 12office because of failure to meet the legislative district residency requirement, the 13attorney general shall immediately commence an action under ch. 784 for a writ of 14quo warranto to have the subject person’s office declared vacant. The attorney 15general shall make a determination as to probable cause under this subdivision no 16later than 30 days after receiving evidence transmitted under subd. 1.AB1063,3,20173. If the attorney general fails to commence an action for quo warranto under 18subd. 2., any elector of the district to which the subject person was elected may 19commence an action under ch. 784 for a writ of quo warranto to have the subject 20person’s office declared vacant.AB1063,3,22214. A declaration under subd. 2. or 3. that a legislative office is vacant creates 22a vacancy in that office for all purposes.AB1063,4,323(c) If the legislative reference bureau, chief clerks, attorney general, 24commission, or courts possess a record received pursuant to this subsection that 1contains the residential address of a person elected to the legislature, that record 2shall remain confidential and is not subject to inspection and copying under s. 19.35 3(1).AB1063,4,44